Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 91

JustBeGreen Villages [Repealed effective July 1, 2026.]

7-91-101. JustBeGreen Villages of America development area. [Repealed effective July 1, 2026.]

An area of property meeting the following description may be deemed, in accordance with this chapter, the JustBeGreen Villages of America development area, and the future site of an agricultural and educational based development supported by state-of-the-art smart technologies to be known as JustBeGreen Villages of America, for purposes of sustainable living and sustainable economic development, including, but not limited to, the development of sustainable technologies, products, and agriculture:

The property is located in a county with a population of not less than twenty-one thousand nine hundred (21,900) and not more than twenty-two thousand (22,000), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census; and

The property consists of not less than two thousand (2,000) contiguous acres.

Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the creation of the futuristic green City of JustBeGreen, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 856.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, §7-91-104.

7-91-102. Petition — Resolution. [Repealed effective July 1, 2026.]

One (1) or more property owners of property within an area described under § 7-91-101 may petition the county commission to be deemed the JustBeGreen Villages of America development area.

For purposes of filing a petition under subsection (a), property owners shall provide to the county commission:

A description of all property to be included in the proposed development area;

The identity of each property owner filing the petition; and

A description of the proposed development and its purpose and land uses within the development area.

Upon receipt of a petition, the county commission may adopt a resolution:

Designating the area described in the petition as the JustBeGreen Villages of America development area; and

Authorizing the area to be referred to as JustBeGreen Villages of America.

Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the creation of the futuristic green City of JustBeGreen, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 856.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, §7-91-104.

7-91-103. Development area not a municipality. [Repealed effective July 1, 2026.]

The JustBeGreen Villages of America development area, designated JustBeGreen Villages of America in accordance with this chapter, is not a municipality for purposes of this code, and does not have the corporate powers and authority of a municipality under this code.

Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the creation of the futuristic green City of JustBeGreen, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 856.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Repealer, §7-91-104.

7-91-104. Repealer. [Repealed effective July 1, 2026.]

This chapter is repealed on July 1, 2026.

Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the creation of the futuristic green City of JustBeGreen, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 856.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 856, § 2. May 3, 2018.